District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-395.01

Management reform plans for District government.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 731, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11102
Mar. 5, 1999, 113 Stat. 3, Pub. L. 106-1, § 3(a)
1981 Ed., § 47-395.1.